South Dakota, session 2026, HB1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-17-5.1 be AMENDED:
22-17-5.1. Any person who administers to any person or who prescribes or
procures for any person any medicine, drug, or substance or uses or employs any
instrument or other means with intent thereby to procure an abortion, unless there is
appropriate and reasonable medical judgment that performance of an abortion is
necessary to preserve the life of the pregnant female, is guilty of a Class 6 felony.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-17:
No person may knowingly dispense, distribute, sell, or advertise any of the
following for purposes of an unlawful abortion pursuant to § 22-17-5.1:
(1) An article or thing designed, adapted, or intended for producing an abortion; or
(2) An article, instrument, substance, drug, medicine, or thing that is advertised or
described in a manner calculated to lead another to use or apply it for producing
an abortion.
A violation of this section is a Class 6 felony.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-17:
The attorney general may recover a civil penalty against a person for violating
section 2 of this Act. The amount of the civil penalty may not exceed ten thousand dollars
for each violation. The clerk of court shall forward any civil penalty collected under this
section to the state treasurer, for deposit in the life protection subfund, as established
within the extraordinary litigation fund pursuant to § 1-33-8.11.

26.582.31 2 1274
The attorney general may recover attorney fees, costs, and any other award the
court determines is appropriate.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-17:
If the attorney general has reason to believe that a person is engaging in, has
engaged in, or is about to engage in a violation of section 2 of this Act, the attorney
general may bring an action in the name of the state against the person to restrain the
person by temporary or permanent injunction.
An action under this section may be brought in the circuit court for the county in
which the alleged violator resides or has a place of business, or in the circuit court for
Hughes County, South Dakota. The court may issue a temporary or permanent injunction
to restrain and prevent any violation of section 2 of this Act.
The attorney general may recover attorney fees, costs, and any other award the
court determines is appropriate.
HB1274 ENROLLED

26.582.31 3 1274
An Act to prohibit the dispensing, distribution, sale, or advertisement of certain articles or
things for purposes of an unlawful abortion and provide a criminal and civil penalty therefor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1274
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1274 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1274 ENROLLED